Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 9. Administration of Group Insurance Plans.

§ 25-15-301.
Contracts for administration of certain insurance plans; requests for proposals; review and evaluation of proposals; awarding and duration of contract; audits; renewal and termination of contracts; transition between administrators.

The board may contract the administration and service of the self-insured program to a third party. Whenever the board chooses to contract with an administrator for the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq., it shall comply with the procedures set forth in this section:

If the board determines that it should contract out the administration of the plan to an administrator, it shall cause to be prepared a request for proposals. This request for proposals shall be prepared for distribution to any interested party. Notice of the board’s intention to seek proposals shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation at least one (1) time per week for three (3) weeks before closing the period for interested parties to respond. Additional forms of notice may also be used. The newspaper notice shall inform the interested parties of the service to be contracted, existence of a request for proposals, how it can be obtained, when a proposal must be submitted, and to whom the proposal must be submitted. All requests for proposals shall describe clearly what service is to be contracted, and shall fully explain the criteria upon which an evaluation of proposals shall be based. The criteria to be used for evaluations s hall, at minimum, include:

The administrator’s proven ability to handle large group accident and health insurance plans;

The efficiency of the claims-paying procedures;

An estimate of the total charges for administering the plan.

All proposals submitted by interested parties shall be evaluated by an internal review committee which shall apply the same criteria to all proposals when conducting an evaluation. The committee shall consist of at least three (3) members of the board. The results and recommendations of the evaluation shall be presented to the board for review. All evaluations presented to the board shall be retained by the board for at least three (3) years. The board may accept or reject any recommendation of the review committee, or it may conduct further inquiry into the proposals. Any further inquiry shall be clearly documented and all methods and recommendations shall be retained by the board and shall spread upon its minutes its choice of administrator and its reasons for making the choice.

(i) The board shall be responsible for preparing a contract that shall be in accordance with all provisions of this section and all other provisions of law. The contract shall also include a requirement that the contractor shall consent to an evaluation of his performance. Such evaluation shall occur after the first six (6) months of the contract, and shall be reviewed at times the board determines to be necessary. The contract shall clearly describe the standards upon which the contractor shall be evaluated. Evaluations shall include, but not be limited to, efficiency in claims processing, including the processing pending claims.

The PEER Committee, at the request of the House or Senate Appropriations Committee or the House or Senate Insurance Committee and with funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose, shall contract with an accounting firm or with other professionals to conduct a compliance audit of any administrator responsible for administering the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq. Such audit shall review the administrator’s compliance with the performance standards required for inclusion in the administrator’s contract. Such audit shall be delivered to the Legislature no later than January 1.

Contracts for the administration of the insurance plan established in Section 25-15-3 et seq. shall commence at the beginning of the calendar year and shall end on the last day of a calendar year. This shall not apply to contracts provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

If the board determines that it is necessary to not renew the contract of an administrator, or finds it necessary to terminate a contract with or without cause as provided for in the contract of the administrator, the board is authorized to select an administrator without complying with the bid requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Such contracts shall be for the balance of the calendar year in which the nonrenewal or termination occurred, and may be for an additional calendar year if the board determines that the best interests of the plan members are served by such. Any contract negotiated on an interim basis shall include a detailed transition plan which shall ensure the orderly transfer of responsibilities between administrators and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding the transfer of records, files and tapes.

Except for contracts executed under the authority of subsection (3) of this section, the board shall select administrators at least six (6) months before the expiration of the current administrator’s contract. The period between the selection of the new administrator and the effective date of the new contract shall be known as the transition period. Whenever the newly selected administrator is an entity different from the entity performing the administrator’s function, it shall be the duty of the board to prepare a detailed transition plan which shall insure the orderly transfer of responsibilities between administrators. This plan shall be effective during the transition period, and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding the transfer of records, files and tapes. Further, the plan shall detail the steps necessary to transfer records and responsibilities and set deadlines for when such steps should be completed. The board shall include in all requests for proposals, contracts with administrators, and all other contracts, provisions requiring the cooperation of administrators and contractors in any future transition of responsibilities, and their cooperation with the board and other contractors with respect to ongoing coordination and delivery of health plan services. The board shall furnish the Legislature, Governor and advisory council with copies of all transition plans and keep them informed of progress on such plans.

No brokerage fees shall be paid for the securing or executing of any contracts pertaining to the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq., whether fully insured or self-insured.

Any corporation, association, company or individual that contracts with the board for the administration or service of the self-insured plan shall remit one hundred percent (100%) of all savings or discounts resulting from any contract to the board or participant, or both. Any corporation, association, company or individual that contracts with the board for the administration or service of the self-insured plan shall allow, upon notice by the board, the board or its designee to audit records of the corporation, association, company or individual relative to the corporation, association, company or individual’s performance under any contract with the board. The information maintained by any corporation, association, company or individual, relating to such contracts, shall be available for inspection upon request by the board and such information shall be compiled in a manner that will provide a clear audit trail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 25-15-303.
State and Public School Employees Health Insurance Management Board.

There is created the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, which shall administer the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan provided for under Section 25-15-3 et seq. The State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, hereafter referred to as the “board,” shall also be responsible for administering all procedures for selecting third-party administrators provided for in Section 25-15-301.

The board shall consist of the following:

The Chairman of the Workers’ Compensation Commission;

The State Personnel Director;

The Commissioner of Insurance, or his designee;

The Commissioner of Higher Education;

The State Superintendent of Public Education;

The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board;

The Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System;

Two (2) appointees of the Governor whose terms shall be concurrent with that of the Governor, one (1) of whom shall have experience in providing actuarial advice to companies that provide health insurance to large groups and one (1) of whom shall have experience in the day-to-day management and administration of a large self-funded health insurance group;

The Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, or his designee;

The Chairman of the House of Representatives Insurance Committee, or his designee;

The Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, or his designee; and

The Chairman of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee, or his designee.

The legislators, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the board.

The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be the chairman of the board.

The board shall meet at least monthly and maintain minutes of the meetings. A quorum shall consist of a majority of the authorized voting membership of the board. The board shall have the sole authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the operations of the insurance plans and shall be vested with all legal authority necessary and proper to perform this function including, but not limited to:

Defining the scope and coverages provided by the insurance plan;

Seeking proposals for services or insurance through competitive processes where required by law and selecting service providers or insurers under procedures provided for by law; and

Developing and adopting strategic plans and budgets for the insurance plan.

The department shall employ a State Insurance Administrator, who shall be responsible for the day-to-day management and administration of the insurance plan. The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide to the board on a full-time basis personnel and technical support necessary and sufficient to effectively and efficiently carry out the requirements of this section.

Members of the board shall not receive any compensation or per diem, but may receive travel reimbursement provided for under Section 25-3-41 except that the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the board shall be paid while the Legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 606, § 10; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 13; Laws, 2005, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014.